translate/lexd/adv.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasAdv
wāзāн:сыро
wāхт-ти:вовремя
wазāн:сыро
wазмин:страшно
wазмин:трудно
wазмин:тяжело
wалāмат:беззаботно
wаллāмат:беззаботно
wахт:давно
wахт:рано
wахтӣнҷā:временно
wақт:давно
wақтӣнҷā:временно
wи-ти:над_тем
wи-ти:так
wи-тӣр:над_тем
wи-тӣр:так
wидир:на_третий_день_вперед
wидир:после_послезавтра
wидобаки:после_восхода_солнца
wидобак:после_восхода_солнца
wидоб:после_восхода_солнца
wийан-га:на_следующий
wируйаги:с_той_стороны
wирӯвҷоwаки:в_стоячем_положении
wирӯйā:на_той_стороне
wирӯйаги:с_той_стороны
wирӯй:на_той_стороне
wитāр-wитāр:устало
wуз-wузик:медленно
wузбаки:поузбекски
wуц-wуцик:медленно
wуч:очень
wӯрҷ-рāнг:как_волк
wӯрҷwор:ловко
wӯрҷwор:поволчьи
wӯрҷwор:смело
āбаробар:сразу
āбаробар:сразу_же
āм-га:а_также
ɣ̌аласт:беспрерывно
ɣ̌аласт:с_лязгом
ɣ̌ибу̊нгаст:с_треском
δар-аθ:далеко
δар:далеко
δардарди:дальше
δарди:дальше
δу-δустāк:обеими_руками
δум-пи-δум:следом_друг_за_другом
δуст-ми-δуст:рука_об_руку
δустаки:вручную
θанаθāн:елееле
θапаст:быстро
θаппаст:быстро
θупаст:быстро
θуппаст:быстро
θӣ-пи-тор:вверх_тормашками
θӣк-θӣк:с_заиканием
а-рāнг-ца:почемуто
а-рāнғāҷ-аθ:как_ни
а-рāнғāҷ:как_ни
а-ранг-ца:почемуто
а-ранғāҷ-аθ:как_ни
а-ранғāҷ:как_ни
а-редрид:туда_вниз
а-редри:туда_вниз
а-сарāк-аθ:снова
аwwал:вопервых
аwwал:сначала
аwал:вопервых
аwало:прежде_всего
аwал:сначала
аwалу̊н:сначала
аwеҷ:незначительно
аwз:глубоко
аwӡ:глубоко
аамард:оттуда
абади:вечно
абор:впервые
абор:один_раз
абор:однажды
аботā:зря
абридах:облачно
абромез:облачно
адли:как_раз
аз-δар-аθ:издалека
аз-δараки:издали
аз-бāраки:наизусть
аз-бāр:наизусть
аз-бараки:наизусть
аз-бар:наизусть
азамāҷанд:вон_у_того
азамāҷард:вон_тому_там
азамāҷинд:вон_у_того
азамāҷирд:вон_тому_там
азамāҷ:оттуда
азамāҷ:там
азаманди:оттуда
азаманди:тогда
азаманд:оттуда
азаманд:тогда
азамандӣр:оттуда
азамандӣр:тогда
азамард:оттуда
азаминди:оттуда
азаминди:тогда
азаминд:оттуда
азаминд:тогда
азаминдӣр:оттуда
азаминдӣр:тогда
азамирд:оттуда
азам:оттуда
азамра:оттуда
азамри:оттуда
азам:там
азамти:оттуда
азамтов:оттуда
азамтӣр:оттуда
азедāҷанд:вот_у_того
азедāҷард:вот_тому
азедāҷинд:вот_у_того
азедāҷирд:вот_тому
азедāҷ:оттуда
азедāҷрад:вот_тому
азедāҷрид:вот_тому
азедāҷ:там
азеданд:местоименное_наречие_средн_ст_оттуда
азеданд:отсюда
азеданд:тогда
азедандӣр:местоименное_наречие_средн_ст_оттуда
азедандӣр:отсюда
азедандӣр:тогда
азедард:оттуда
азединдӣр:местоименное_наречие_средн_ст_оттуда
азединдӣр:тогда
азедирд:оттуда
азед:отсюда
азед:с_той_стороны
азед:там
азедти:оттуда
азедтов:оттуда
азедтӣр:оттуда
азенди:местоименное_наречие_средн_ст_оттуда
азенди:тогда
азендӣр:местоименное_наречие_средн_ст_оттуда
азендӣр:тогда
азерад:оттуда
азерид:оттуда
азе:с_той_стороны
азе:там
азети:оттуда
азетов:оттуда
азетӣр:оттуда
азолаwу̊н:повсякому
азору̊н:сколько_ни
азору̊н:часто
азу̊дāҷанд:вот_у_этого
азу̊дāҷард:вот_этому
азу̊дāҷ:здесь
азу̊дāҷинд:вот_у_этого
азу̊дāҷирд:вот_этому
азу̊дāҷ:отсюда
азу̊дāҷра:вот_этому
азу̊дāҷрад:вот_этому
азу̊дāҷри:вот_этому
азу̊дāҷрид:вот_этому
азу̊данд:отсюда
азу̊данд:тут
азу̊дандӣр:отсюда
азу̊дандӣр:тут
азу̊дард:отсюда
азу̊д:здесь
азу̊динди:отсюда
азу̊динди:тут
азу̊диндӣр:отсюда
азу̊диндӣр:тут
азу̊дирд:отсюда
азу̊д:отсюда
азу̊дти:отсюда
азу̊дтов:отсюда
азу̊дтӣр:отсюда
азу̊:здесь
азу̊нди:отсюда
азу̊нди:тут
азу̊ндӣр:отсюда
азу̊ндӣр:тут
азу̊:отсюда
азу̊рад:отсюда
азу̊рид:отсюда
азу̊ти:отсюда
азу̊тов:отсюда
азу̊тӣр:отсюда
азумāҷанд:вон_у_того
азумāҷард:вон_тому_там
азумāҷ:оттуда
азумāҷ:там
азумард:оттуда
азум:оттуда
азумра:оттуда
азум:там
азумти:оттуда
азумтов:оттуда
азумтӣр:оттуда
айwу̊нгари:поскотски
айwу̊ни:поскотски
айф:зря
алаθ:как_раз
албат:наверное
албаттā:конечно
али:как_раз
алли:как_раз
алмиду̊м:всегда
алмуду̊м:всегда
алойидā:отдельно
алойид:отдельно
алол:как_следует
алу̊мот:трудно
ам-дигар:взаимно
амаги:в_целом
амаги:вс
амаги:всего_лишь
аматарафā:всесторонне
амбоз:совместно
амдойи:зря
амех̌ā:всегда
амро:вместе
амрогу̊н:вместе
амройен:вместе
амтаро:не_беда
аму̊нат:взаймы
аму̊нати:взаймы
амчуну̊н:так
амчунӣн:так
андак-аθ:немножечко
андак-мандак:немного
андак-мундак:немного
андакик:немножечко
андак:немного
андарғамуч:упрямо
антаро:не_беда
ар-кā:куда
ар-меθā:ежедневно
ар-меθаθ:ежедневно
ар-меθаки:ежедневно
ар-меθ:ежедневно
ар-рāнг-ца:както
ар-рāнг-ца:почемуто
ар-рāнғāҷ-аθ:как_ни
ар-рāнғāҷ:как_ни
ар-ранг-ца:почемуто
ар-ранғāҷ-аθ:как_ни
ар-ранғāҷ:как_ни
ар-цу̊н-ца:очень
ар-цу̊нд-ца:очень
ар-ҷо:везде
араби:поарабски
арайи:потри
арамāҷанд:у_тех
арамāҷард:тем
арамāҷинд:у_тех
арамāҷирд:тем
арамāҷрê:тем
арамāҷрā:тем
арамāҷрад:тем
арамāҷра:тем
арамāҷрид:тем
арамāҷри:тем
арамāҷрӣ:тем
арамāҷ:там
арамāҷ:туда
араманд:у_тех
арамард:туда_вниз
арамец:дотуда
араминд:у_тех
арамирд:туда_вниз
арам:там
арам:туда
аргиз:никогда
аредāҷанд:у_тех
аредāҷард:тем
аредāҷинд:у_тех
аредāҷирд:тем
аредāҷ:там
аредāҷ:туда
ареданд:у_тех
аредард:туда_вниз
аредец:дотуда
арединд:у_тех
аредирд:туда_вниз
аредра:туда_вниз
аред:там
аред:туда
аре:там
аре:туда
арзу̊н:дешево
аррӯзā:ежедневно
артарафā:всесторонне
ару̊дāҷанд:у_тех
ару̊дāҷард:этим
ару̊дāҷ:здесь
ару̊дāҷинд:у_тех
ару̊дāҷирд:этим
ару̊дāҷрê:этим
ару̊дāҷрā:этим
ару̊дāҷрад:этим
ару̊дāҷра:этим
ару̊дāҷрид:этим
ару̊дāҷри:этим
ару̊дāҷрӣ:этим
ару̊дāҷ:сюда
ару̊данд:у_этих
ару̊дард:сюда_вниз
ару̊дец:досюда
ару̊д:здесь
ару̊динд:у_этих
ару̊дирд:сюда_вниз
ару̊дра:сюда_вниз
ару̊дрид:сюда_вниз
ару̊дри:сюда_вниз
ару̊д:сюда
ару̊:здесь
ару̊:сюда
арумāҷанд:у_тех
арумāҷард:тем
арумāҷ:там
арумāҷ:туда
аруманд:у_тех
арумард:туда_вниз
арумец:дотуда
арум:там
арум:туда
арӯзā:ежедневно
ас-wи-сāри:перед_рассветом
ас-wи-сāру̊ни:перед_рассветом
ас-wи-саҳари:перед_рассветом
ас-δар-аθ:издалека
ас-δараки:издали
ас-бāраки:наизусть
ас-бāр:наизусть
ас-бараки:наизусть
ас-бар:наизусть
ас-ваҷ:снаружи
ас-дарӯн:изнутри
ас-йāндаθ:по_очереди
ас-йāндаθ:сначала
ас-йӯндаθ:отсюда
ас-йӯндаθ:по_очереди
ас-йӯндаθ:сначала
ас-кā:как
ас-кāнди:как
ас-кāнди:откуда
ас-кā:откуда
ас-пиро:спереди
ас-рост-аθ:вправду
ас-сарāк-аθ:снова
ас-қāст-аθ:нарочно
ас-қāст-аθ:немножко
ас-қастак-аθ:нарочно
ас-қастак-аθ:немножко
асли-дайн-аθ:действительно
асло:никак
асло:совсем
асосанд:на_самом_деле
асоси:в_самом_деле
асӣδ:в_этом_году
асӣ:в_этом_году
асӣд:в_этом_году
атмê-θ:обязательно
атманд-аθ:безусловно
атманд:безусловно
атми-йаθ:обязательно
атми:непременно
атроф:вокруг
афаw:послезавтра
афаɣ̌:послезавтра
ах̌ӣб:вчера
ах̌ӣбен:вчера
ах̌ӣбен:позавчера
ах̌ӣб:позавчера
ах̌ӣб:третьего_дня
ач-гад:еще
ач-гад:с_последующим_отрицанием_больше_не
ач-га:еще
ач-га:с_последующим_отрицанием_больше_не
ач-гид:еще
ач-гид:с_последующим_отрицанием_больше_не
ач-ги:еще
ач-ги:с_последующим_отрицанием_больше_не
ач-мāл:никогда
ач-мāл:с_последующим_отрицание
ачаθ:ничто
аччаθ:ничто
ақêқатан-аθ:действительно
ақêқатанд-аθ:действительно
ақêқатанд:действительно
ақêқатан:действительно
ақиқатан:действительно
ақу̊ни:справедливо
аққу̊ни:справедливо
аҷаб:очень
бêх-ец:досконально
бêхи:никогда
бā-лāҷā:красноречиво
бāд:затем
бāди:после
бāд:после
бāзан:иногда
бāр:много
бāс:довольно
ба-wахт:заблаговременно
ба-wахт:скорее
ба-аwҷ:с_увлечением
ба-алоли:добросовестно
ба-гуму̊н:предположительно
ба-гумӯн:предположительно
ба-дастā:не_давая_шевельнуться
ба-дил:по_сердцу
ба-динйойи:очень_сильно
ба-диқат:внимательно
ба-дӣдани:с_трудом
ба-дӣди:по_сравнению
ба-зеб:хорошо
ба-зӯди:быстро
ба-зӯраθ:силою
ба-зӯр:силою
ба-йоδ:в_памяти
ба-лог-аθ:шутя
ба-лоғаθ:шутя
ба-марwат:осторожно
ба-мисли:подобно
ба-ного:вдруг
ба-нокāф-анд:вдруг
ба-нокāфаθ:вдруг
ба-нокāфанд:вдруг
ба-нокāф:вдруг
ба-раwах̌:удобно
ба-раwих̌:удобно
ба-раот:спокойно
ба-сӯзаθ:пылко
ба-сӯз:пылко
ба-тāмул:сдержанно
ба-таамул:сдержанно
ба-тифоқаθ:дружно
ба-тифоқ:дружно
ба-тифоқи:дружно
ба-фāнд-аθ:хитро
ба-фāнд:хитро
ба-фиреб-аθ:хитро
ба-фиреб:умышленно
ба-фурҷаθ:осмотрительно
ба-фурҷа:осмотрительно
ба-хушиаθ:с_радостью
ба-хуши:с_радостью
ба-ғайри:только
ба-қāроw:сердито
ба-қарwор:сердито
ба-қаст:нарочно
бадараw:прочь
бадарраw:прочь
бад:плохо
базӯди:быстро
базӯр-аθ:насильно
базӯр:едва
базӯри-аθ:с_трудом
базӯри:с_трудом
байелā:едва
байелā:елееле
байелā:чуть_не
байелā:чутьчуть
байлā:едва
байлā:чуть_не
байлā:чутьчуть
байт-лу̊вд:очень_много
баланд:высоко
баланд:громко
балафтā:зря
балелā:едва
балелā:чуть_не
балелā:чутьчуть
баор-субā:ранней_весной
баорчев:каждую_весну
бар-боδ:на_ветер
бар-ди-рӯғ-аθ:зря
бар-ди-рӯғ-аθ:ложно
бар-диру̊ғ-аθ:зря
бар-диру̊ғ-аθ:ложно
бар-диру̊ғ:лживо
бар-дирӯғ-аθ:зря
бар-дирӯғ-аθ:ложно
бар-дирӯғ:лживо
бар-дуру̊ғ-аθ:зря
бар-дуру̊ғ-аθ:ложно
бар-дуру̊ғ:лживо
бар-дурӯғ:лживо
бар-дурӯғ:ложно
бар-таму̊м:целиком
бар-фалак:на_небо
бар-фалак:повсюду
бар-қаст:нарочно
бар-ҷойаки:безвыходно
бар-ҷой:на_месте
бар-ҷой:на_место
бар-ҷо:на_месте
барwахт-аθ:рано
барwахт:рано
барwақт:рано
баракс:наоборот
бараот:удобно
бараст:быстро
бараҳот:удобно
бармук:изнеможенно
баробар:в_порядке
баробар:достаточно
баробар:как_раз
баробар:напротив
баробар:ровно
барости:напротив
барости:прямо
барост:напротив
барост:прямо
барраст:быстро
бат-бат:с_бульканьем
бат-чи-бат:в_объятиях
батāр:хуже
башāнд:как_следует
башāнд:очень_хорошо
башāнд:хорошо
башшāнд:как_следует
башшāнд:очень_хорошо
башшāнд:хорошо
бағер:наверно
бе-андех̌ā:необдуманно
бе-андех̌ā:очень
бе-дод:в_сиротстве
бе-дӣданêθ:беспрепятственно
бе-дӣдани:беспрепятственно
бе-нашā:очень_много
бе-нашар:очень_много
бе-худ:без_памяти
бе-ғайри:только
бе-ғулғāш-аθ:беззаботно
беwахт:поздно
беwоситā-θ:непосредственно
беwоситā-аθ:непосредственно
беwоситā:непосредственно
беwудā-θ:бесполезно
беwудā-аθ:бесполезно
беwудā:бесполезно
беwуддā:бесполезно
беwуддā:зря
беāдаθ:без_договора
беāд:без_договора
беāд:много
беāд:очень
беад:много
беад:очень
беайб-аθ:незаслуженно
беандозā:безмерно
беасос-аθ:необоснованно
беасос:необоснованно
беастāр:без_подкладки
беатйот:неосторожно
бегуму̊н:несомненно
бегуфтигӯйаθ:безоговорочно
бегуфтигӯйаθ:обязательно
бегуфтигӯй:безоговорочно
бегуфтигӯй:обязательно
бегуфтугӯйаθ:безоговорочно
бегуфтугӯйаθ:обязательно
бегуфтугӯй:безоговорочно
бегуфтугӯй:обязательно
бедалӣл:слишком_много
бедарак-аθ:без_толку
бедарак:без_толку
бедод:чрезмерно
беетйот:неосторожно
безеб:некрасиво
беихтийор:невольно
бекорā-θ:бесполезно
бемāйор:несвоевременно
бемаwрид:несвоевременно
бемаwқе:неуместно
бемаал:несвоевременно
бемалол:непринужденно
бемаму̊нийат-аθ:беспрепятственно
бемаму̊нийат:беспрепятственно
беманфийат:бесполезно
бемашақат-аθ:беспрепятственно
бемашақат:без_трудностей
бемашаққат-аθ:беспрепятственно
бемашаққат:без_трудностей
бемақсад-аθ:бесцельно
бемақсад:бесцельно
бемаҳал:несвоевременно
бемузд-аθ:бесплатно
бемунфат:бесполезно
бенаwбат:вне_очереди
беназорат:без_присмотра
бенатӣҷā:безрезультатно
бениойат:бесконечно
бених̌у̊н:без_счета
бених̌у̊н:беспредельно
бенубат:вне_очереди
бенуойат:бесконечно
бенуҳойат:бесконечно
бенуӽойат:бесконечно
бепарwо:беспечно
бепӯл-аθ:бесплатно
бепӯл:бесплатно
бераот:неудобно
бераҳот:неудобно
беруот:неудобно
беруҳот:неудобно
берӯн:вне
бесаwоб:не_в_норме
бесабаб-аθ:без_причины
бесабаб:беспричинно
бесамарwор:торопливо
бесамарwу̊р:торопливо
бесамар:торопливо
бетāмул:необдуманно
бетāғӣр:неизменно
бетаwфêқги:внезапно
бетаwфêқги:возможно
бетаwфêқи:внезапно
бетаwфêқи:возможно
бетааммул:необдуманно
бетаамул:необдуманно
беташwӣш-аθ:спокойно
бетйот:неосторожно
бетоwфêқги:внезапно
бетоwфêқги:возможно
бетоwфêқи:внезапно
бетоwфêқи:возможно
беудā:бесполезно
беуддā:зря
бех̌:больше
бех̌дарди:больше
бех̌дарди:по_большей_части
бех̌ди:больше
бех̌диди:больше
бех̌диди:по_большей_части
бех̌ди:по_большей_части
бех̌:часто
бехабар-аθ:неожиданно
бехарч-аθ:без_продуктов
бехарҷ-аθ:без_продуктов
бехато:безошибочно
бехилӣwаθ:вдруг
бехилӣwанд:вдруг
бешак:несомненно
бешарāт:очень_много
беғам-аθ:беззаботно
беғам:беспечно
беғаразу̊нā:бескорыстно
беғаразу̊нā:беспристрастно
беқонӯн:незаконно
беҷой:неуместно
беҷо:неуместно
беӯдā:зря
бигāму̊н-анд:в_мгновение_ока
бигāму̊н-анд:неожиданно
бигāму̊н-инд:в_мгновение_ока
бигāму̊н-инд:неожиданно
бизғумчи:торопливо
бизғумчи:усиленно
бийор-амеθ:весь_вчерашний_день
бийор-ах̌āб:всю_прошлую_ночь
бийор-рамеθ:весь_вчерашний_день
бийор-рах̌āб:всю_прошлую_ночь
бийор:вчера
билāнд:высоко
билāнд:громко
биланд:высоко
биланд:громко
билақаст:с_бульканьем
билифтā:зря
бируш-май-май:торопливо
бисйор:много
биттā:немножко
